Connecticut, session 2026, HB05257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 47a-21 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this chapter:
(1) "Accrued interest" means the interest due on a security deposit as
provided in subsection (i) of this section, compounded annually to the
extent applicable.
(2) "Commissioner" means the Banking Commissioner.
(3) "Escrow account" means any account at a financial institution
which is not subject to execution by the creditors of the escrow agent
and includes a clients' funds account.
(4) "Escrow agent" means the person in whose name an escrow
account is maintained.
LCO No. 851 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5257
(5) "Financial institution" means any state bank and trust company,
national bank, savings bank, federal savings bank, savings and loan
association, and federal savings and loan association that is located in
this state.
(6) "Forwarding address" means the address to which a security
deposit may be mailed for delivery to a former tenant.
(7) "Landlord" means any landlord of residential real property, and
includes (A) any receiver; (B) any successor; and (C) any tenant who
sublets his premises.
(8) "Receiver" means any person who is appointed or authorized by
any state, federal or probate court to receive rents from tenants, and
includes trustees, executors, administrators, guardians, conservators,
receivers, and receivers of rent.
(9) "Rent receiver" means a receiver who lacks court authorization to
return security deposits and to inspect the premises of tenants and
former tenants.
(10) "Residential real property" means real property containing one
or more residential units, including residential units not owned by the
landlord, and containing one or more tenants who paid a security
deposit.
(11) "Security deposit" means any advance rental payment, or any
installment payment collected pursuant to section 47a-22a, except an
advance payment for the first month's rent or a deposit for a key or any
special equipment.
(12) "Successor" means any person who succeeds to a landlord's
interest whether by purchase, foreclosure or otherwise and includes a
receiver.
(13) "Tenant" means a tenant, as defined in section 47a-1, or a resident,
as defined in section 21-64.
LCO No. 851 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5257
(14) "Tenant's obligations" means (A) the amount of any rental or
utility payment due the landlord from a tenant; (B) a tenant's obligations
under the provisions of section 47a-11; and (C) the actual reasonable cost
of changing the locks of the dwelling unit pursuant to section 47a-7b, if
the tenant has not paid such cost.
(b) (1) In the case of [a tenant under sixty-two years of age] any rental
agreement, defined under section 47a-1, entered into on or after October
1, 2026, a landlord shall not demand or accept from a tenant a security
deposit in an amount that exceeds [two months'] one month's rent.
(2) [In the case of a tenant sixty-two years of age or older, a landlord
shall not demand a security deposit in an amount that exceeds one
month's rent.] Any landlord who has received a security deposit in an
amount that exceeds one month's rent from a tenant who becomes sixty-
two years of age after paying such security deposit shall return the
portion of such security deposit that exceeds one month's rent to the
tenant upon the tenant's request.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 8-339 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Housing shall establish, within available
appropriations, and administer a security deposit guarantee program
for (1) any individual or family whose income is sixty per cent or less of
the median income of the state, adjusted for family size, as determined
by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
and who have a documented financial need as determined by the
commissioner, (2) any individual who is served a writ, summons and
complaint in a summary process action instituted pursuant to chapter
832, or (3) any individual who receives a certificate or voucher from a
rental assistance program or federal Housing Choice Voucher program.
Under the security deposit guarantee program, the commissioner may
provide security deposit guarantees for use by persons who are eligible
LCO No. 851 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5257
pursuant to this subsection in lieu of a security deposit on a rental
dwelling unit. Eligible persons may receive a security deposit guarantee
in an amount not to exceed the equivalent of [two months'] one month's
rent on such rental unit. No person may apply for and receive a security
deposit guarantee more than once in any twenty-four-month period
without the express authorization of the commissioner, except as
provided in subsection (b) of this section. The commissioner may deny
eligibility for the program to an applicant for whom the commissioner
has paid one or more claims by landlords. The commissioner shall
prioritize the provision of security deposit guarantees to eligible
veterans and may establish priorities for providing security deposit
guarantees to other eligible persons described in subdivisions (1) to (3),
inclusive, of this subsection in order to administer the program within
available appropriations.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-21(a) and (b)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 8-339(a)